Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Notice to workers. new text end new text begin Each employer must post and maintain printed materials outlining an individual's rights under the Minnesota Human Rights Act. This material must include rights of an individual to file a charge with the commissioner or to bring a civil action authorized under section 363A.33, subdivision 1. These materials must be maintained in a location readily accessible to workers in the employer's service. Businesses are encouraged to provide information in plain language using adult learning principles on how both employers and employees are stronger when civil rights laws are followed. Businesses are also encouraged to identify, prevent, and reduce prohibited discriminatory conduct under this chapter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.13, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notice to students. new text end new text begin Before the beginning of each school year, each school district must inform students, parents, and legal guardians of their rights under the Minnesota Human Rights Act by publicly posting on the district or educational institution's website in the languages appearing on the institution's website, consistent with district policies and practices. The notice must include the name, office address, and phone number of the persons designated to coordinate compliance. The coordinator shall be the principal or the principal's designee. Districts and schools are encouraged to: (1) regularly provide developmentally appropriate programmatic instruction to help students understand that they learn best when civil rights laws are followed; and (2) identify, prevent, and reduce prohibited discriminatory conduct under this chapter. new text end